Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 4 Bonding of Conservators

29-3-40.
Bond required; exception; recording of bonds.

A conservator appointed by the court shall give bond with good and sufficient security.

A financial institution, trust company, national or state bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association described in Code Section 7-1-242 that seeks to qualify as a conservator is not required to give bond for the faithful performance of its duties unless its combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits are less than $3 million as reflected in its last statement filed with the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States or the commissioner of banking and finance.

The clerk of the court shall record bonds in books kept for that purpose and shall retain custody of the bonds.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-41.
Requirements of bond; term and value of bond; appointment without bond; substantial compliance sufficient.

The bond of a conservator shall be:

Secured by an individual who is a domiciliary of this state or by a licensed commercial surety authorized to transact business in this state;

Payable to the court for the benefit of the minor;

Conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the conservator’s duty, as is required by law; and

Attested by the judge or clerk of the court.

The court may order a conservator who is required to give bond to post bond for a period of time greater than one year, as may be appropriate in the circumstances. A surety on a bond posted pursuant to this subsection shall not be relieved of liability merely because of the expiration of the term of the bond but shall be subject to the provisions of law for the discharge of a surety applicable to other bonds.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, the bond shall be in a value equal to double the estimated value of the minor’s estate; provided, however, that the bond shall be in an amount equal to the estimated value of the estate if secured by a licensed commercial surety authorized to transact business in this state. The value of the estate for purposes of the bond shall be determined without regard to the value of any real property or improvements thereon but, upon conversion of the real property into personal property, a bond shall be given based upon the value of the estate, including the value of the personal property into which the real property was converted.

When the assets of the estate consist of only one or more choses in action of indeterminate value, no bond shall be required until the value of any such chose in action is able to be determined by settlement or judgment, whereupon bond shall be set in an amount to be determined in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section; provided, however, that a conservator appointed without bond pursuant to this subsection shall have no authority to receive assets of the minor’s estate other than a chose or choses in action until such conservator has posted bond in accordance with this Code section. As used in this subsection, the term “chose in action” shall have the same meaning as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 12 of Title 44.

Substantial compliance with these requirements for the bond shall be deemed sufficient; and no bond shall be declared invalid by reason of any variation from these requirements as to payee, amount, or condition, where the manifest intention was to give bond as conservator and a breach of the fiduciary’s duty as such has been proved.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 207, § 5/HB 620.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, substituted “Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, the bond” for “The bond” at the beginning of subsection (c); added subsection (d); and redesignated former subsection (d) as present subsection (e).

Cross references.

Time limitation on bringing of actions against guardians, §

9-3-27

.

Statute of limitations for prosecution for conversion by guardian of property of ward, §

17-3-2

.

29-3-42.
Reduction of bond.

If the value of the minor’s bonded estate decreases, the court may permit a corresponding reduction in the value of the bond, but this reduction does not affect the liability of the surety for prior waste or misconduct of the conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-43.
Requirement of additional bond; notice in event of sureties deficiencies; revocation of letters of conservatorship.

When it comes to the attention of the court, either by annual return or otherwise:

That additional personal property has accrued to the minor by descent, gift, or otherwise or that for any other reason the bond or security of the conservator fails to comply with the minimum statutory bond amount set forth in Code Section 29-3-40; or

That the bond or security is otherwise insufficient in the judgment of the court,

the court shall give notice to the conservator to appear and give additional bond or security. Notice shall be mailed by first-class mail to the conservator and to the surety on the conservator’s bond. If the conservator fails to comply with the notice, the court may revoke the letters of conservatorship in accordance with Code Section 29-3-82.

When it comes to the attention of the court that the surety on the conservator’s bond has died, become insolvent, or removed from this state or if from other cause the security becomes insufficient, the court may give notice to the conservator to appear give other and sufficient security. Notice shall be mailed by first-class mail to the conservator and to the surety on the conservator’s bond. If the conservator fails to comply with the notice, the court may revoke the letters of conservatorship in accordance with Code Section 29-3-82.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Application by surety or personal representative to be relieved and requirement that thereupon guardian give other security or be discharged, §

29-2-52

.

29-3-44.
Payment of bond premium.

A conservator who is required to give bond, and who has given as security on such bond one or more licensed commercial sureties, may pay any bond premium from the estate.

When the guardian is required to give bond pursuant to Code Section 29-2-25, the conservator shall, upon the request of the guardian, pay any bond premium from the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 4/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, inserted “, upon the request of the guardian,” in the middle of subsection (b).

Cross references.

Time limitation on bringing of actions against guardians, §

9-3-27

.

Statute of limitations for prosecution for conversion by guardian of property of ward, §

17-3-2

.

29-3-45.
Responsibility of surety in event appointment of conservator void.

If the appointment of a conservator for any cause is declared void, the surety of that conservator shall nevertheless be responsible on the bond for any property received by the conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-46.
Joint and several obligation.

The conservator and any surety shall be held and deemed joint and several obligors and may be subjected jointly and severally to liability in the same action. When a conservator moves beyond the limits of this state, dies and leaves an unrepresented estate, or is in such a position that an attachment may be issued as against a debtor, any party in interest or any person having demands against that conservator in the conservator’s representative capacity may institute an action against any one or more of the sureties on the bond of the conservator in the first instance, without first obtaining a judgment against the conservator in that person’s representative capacity.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-47.
Levy upon property authorized; writ of execution authorized.

When a judgment has been obtained against the conservator or the surety on the bond of a conservator, or both, a levy may be made upon any property of any defendant in fi. fa.

The court shall be authorized to enter a judgment and to issue a writ of execution against the conservator and surety on the bond and shall be authorized to grant judgment and execution in favor of the surety against the conservator upon payment of the judgment by the surety.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-48.
Levy upon surety then conservator.

In all cases of judgments recovered against a conservator or any surety of a conservator, the execution shall first be levied on the property of the surety and no levy shall be made on the property of the conservator until there is a return of nulla bona as to the surety.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-49.
Petition for release from surety obligation; order of discharge; appointment and liability of new surety; accounting requirement.

The surety on the bond of any conservator or, if the surety is dead, the surety’s personal representative, may at any time petition the court regarding any misconduct of the conservator in the discharge of the conservator’s trust or to show the court its desire for any reason to be relieved as surety. The death of a surety shall be a sufficient ground for the discharge of the surety from future liability.

Upon a petition by the surety or the surety’s personal representative, the court shall cite the conservator to appear and show cause, if any, why the surety should not be discharged. After hearing the parties and the evidence, the court, in its discretion, may issue an order discharging the surety from all future liability and requiring the conservator to give new and sufficient security or be removed as conservator.

If new security is given, the discharged surety shall be discharged only from liability for future misconduct of the conservator from the time the new security is given. The new surety shall be liable for past as well as future misconduct of the conservator.

If new security is not given and the conservator is removed, the discharged surety shall be bound for a true accounting of the conservator with the successor conservator or with the minor if no other conservator is appointed. In all cases where letters of conservatorship are revoked, any surety on the bond shall be liable for all acts of the conservator in relation to the trust up to the time of the settlement with the new conservator or the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Requiring guardian to give other security or be discharged on application of ward’s relative or on court’s own motion, §

29-4-15

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article on wills, trusts and administration of estates, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 381 (1998).